Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB410.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 527.010 is amended to read as follows:
The following definitions apply in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) (a) "Assault weapon" means a:
1. Semiautomatic rifle that has an ability to accept a detachable
magazine and has at least one (1) of the following characteristics:
a. A folding or telescoping stock;
b. A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of
the weapon;
c. A second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the
nontrigger hand;
d. A bayonet mount;
e. A flash suppressor, muzzle break, muzzle compensator, or
threaded barrel designed to accommodate a flash suppressor,
muzzle break, or muzzle compensator; or
f. A grenade launcher;
2. Semiautomatic shotgun that has at least one (1) of the following
characteristics:
a. A folding or telescoping stock;
b. A second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the
nontrigger hand;
c. A fixed magazine capacity in excess of seven (7) rounds; or
d. An ability to accept a detachable magazine;
3. Semiautomatic pistol that has an ability to accept a detachable
magazine and has at least one (1) of the following characteristics:
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/27/2025 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1050
a. A folding or telescoping stock;
b. A second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the
nontrigger hand;
c. Capacity to accept an ammunition magazine that attaches to the
pistol outside of the pistol grip;
d. A threaded barrel capable of accepting a barrel extender, flash
suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer;
e. A shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely encircles,
the barrel and that permits the shooter to hold the firearm with
the nontrigger hand without being burned; or
f. A manufactured weight of fifty (50) ounces or more when the
pistol is unloaded;
4. Semiautomatic version of an automatic rifle, shotgun, or firearm; or
5. Revolving cylinder shotgun.
(b) "Assault weapon" does not include:
1. Any rifle, shotgun, or pistol that:
a. Is manually operated by bolt, pump, lever, or slide action;
b. Has been rendered permanently inoperable; or
c. Is an antique firearm as defined in 18 U.S.C. sec. 921;
2. A semiautomatic rifle that cannot accept a detachable magazine that
holds more than five (5) rounds of ammunition; or
3. A semiautomatic shotgun that cannot hold more than five (5) rounds
of ammunition in a fixed or detachable magazine;
(2) "Booby trap device" has[shall have] the same meaning as[ set forth] in KRS
237.030;[.]
(3)[(2)] "Deface" means to remove, deface, cover, alter, or destroy the manufacturer's
serial number or any other distinguishing number or identification mark;[.]
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/27/2025 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1050
(4)[(3)] "Destructive device" has [shall have ]the same meaning as[ set forth] in KRS
237.030;[.]
(5)[(4)] "Firearm" means any weapon which will expel a projectile by the action of an
explosive;[.]
(6)[(5)] "Handgun" means any pistol or revolver originally designed to be fired by the
use of a single hand, or any other firearm originally designed to be fired by the use
of a single hand; and[.]
(7) (a) "Large capacity ammunition feeding device" means a magazine, belt, drum,
feed strip, or similar device that has a capacity of or that can be readily
restored or converted to accept more than ten (10) rounds of ammunition.
(b) "Large capacity ammunition feeding device" does not include:
1. An attached tubular device designed to accept and capable of
operating with only .22 caliber rimfire ammunition; or
2. A curio or relic feeding device. As used in this subparagraph, "curio
or relic feeding device" means a feeding device that:
a. Was manufactured at least fifty (50) years prior to the current
date, not including replicas;
b. Is only capable of being used exclusively in a firearm, rifle, or
shotgun that was manufactured at least fifty (50) years prior to
the current date, not including replicas; and
c. Is possessed by an individual who is not prohibited by state or
federal law from possessing a firearm.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 527 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person is guilty of
possession or transfer of a large capacity ammunition feeding device when he or
she knowingly:
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/27/2025 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1050
(a) Possesses a large capacity ammunition feeding device; or
(b) Transfers a large capacity ammunition feeding device to another person
through any means.
(2) Possession or transfer of a large capacity ammunition feeding device is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(3) This section shall not apply to:
(a) A person who is a:
1. Member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a reserve
component of the Armed Forces of the United States, or the National
Guard; or
2. Law enforcement officer as defined in KRS 15.310; or
(b) Any large capacity ammunition feeding device lawfully possessed prior to
the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 527 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person is guilty of
possession or transfer of an assault weapon when he or she knowingly:
(a) Possesses an assault weapon; or
(b) Transfers an assault weapon to another person through any means.
(2) Possession or transfer of an assault weapon is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) This section shall not apply to:
(a) A person who is a:
1. Member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a reserve
component of the Armed Forces of the United States, or the National
Guard; or
2. Law enforcement officer as defined in KRS 15.310; or
(b) Any assault weapon lawfully possessed prior to the effective date of this Act.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/27/2025 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1050
Section 4. KRS 237.104 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person, unit of government, or governmental organization shall, during a period
of disaster or emergency as specified in KRS Chapter 39A or at any other time,
have the right to revoke, suspend, limit the use of, or otherwise impair the validity
of the right of any person to purchase, transfer, loan, own, possess, carry, or use a
firearm, firearm part, ammunition, ammunition component, or any deadly weapon
or dangerous instrument.
(2) No person, unit of government, or governmental organization shall, during a period
of disaster or emergency as specified in KRS Chapter 39A or at any other time,
take, seize, confiscate, or impound a firearm, firearm part, ammunition, ammunition
component, or any deadly weapon or dangerous instrument from any person.
(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply to the taking of an item specified in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section from a person who is:
(a) Forbidden to possess a firearm pursuant to KRS 527.040 or Section 2 or 3 of
this Act;
(b) Forbidden to possess a firearm pursuant to federal law;
(c) Violating KRS 527.020 or Section 2 or 3 of this Act;
(d) In possession of a stolen firearm;
(e) Using a firearm in the commission of a separate criminal offense; or
(f) Using a firearm or other weapon in the commission of an offense under KRS
Chapter 150.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/27/2025 1:46 PM Jacketed